Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB209.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In the discharge of the duties imposed by this chapter the secretary or his or her
duly authorized representative may administer oaths and affirmations, take
depositions, certify official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of
witnesses and production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other
records considered necessary and relevant as evidence in connection with the
administration of the cabinet. Such subpoena shall be served in the same manner as
a subpoena issued out of a Circuit Court.
(2) A[No] person shall not be excused from attending and testifying or from producing
books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, or other records in response to such
subpoena on the grounds that the evidence required of him or her may tend to
incriminate him or her or subject him or her to a penalty[,] or forfeiture. No person
shall be prosecuted or subjected to any suit, penalty, or forfeiture on account of any
transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she or his or her agent or
worker is compelled, after having claimed privilege against self-incrimination, to
give evidence except that such witness so testifying shall not be exempt from
punishment for perjury.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 10:08 AM Jacketed